Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1221
Threatening the use of explosives; placing a false bomb; penalty.

(1) A person who conveys any threat or maliciously conveys to any other person false information knowing the same to be false, concerning an attempt or alleged attempt being made or to be made to kill, injure, or intimidate any individual or unlawfully to damage or destroy any building, vehicle, or other real or personal property by means of any explosive material or destructive device commits the offense of threatening the use of explosives.

(2) A person who places or causes to be placed any device or object that by its design, construction, content, or character appears to be or appears to contain a bomb, destructive device, or explosive, but is in fact an inoperative facsimile or imitation of a bomb, destructive device, or explosive, and that such person knows, intends, or reasonably believes is likely to cause public alarm or inconvenience, commits the offense of placing a false bomb.

(3) Threatening the use of explosives or placing a false bomb is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 253;

Laws 2002, LB 82, § 10.